Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.688

Family day-care provider's home facility—City or town may not prohibit in residential or commercial area—Conditions.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, no city or town may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or administrative practice that prohibits the use of a residential dwelling, located in an area zoned for residential or commercial use, as a family day-care provider's facility serving twelve or fewer children.

(2) A city or town may require that the facility: (a) Comply with all building, fire, safety, health code, and business licensing requirements; (b) conform to lot size, building size, setbacks, and lot coverage standards applicable to the zoning district except if the structure is a legal nonconforming structure; (c) is certified by the department of children, youth, and families licensor as providing a safe passenger loading area; (d) include signage, if any, that conforms to applicable regulations; and (e) limit hours of operations to facilitate neighborhood compatibility, while also providing appropriate opportunity for persons who use family day-care who work a nonstandard work shift.

(3) A city or town may also require that the family day-care provider, before state licensing, require proof of written notification by the provider that the immediately adjoining property owners have been informed of the intent to locate and maintain such a facility. If a dispute arises between neighbors and the day-care provider over licensing requirements, the licensor may provide a forum to resolve the dispute.

(4) This section may not be construed to prohibit a city or town from imposing zoning conditions on the establishment and maintenance of a family day-care provider's home serving twelve or fewer children in an area zoned for residential or commercial use, if the conditions are no more restrictive than conditions imposed on other residential dwellings in the same zone and the establishment of such facilities is not precluded. As used in this section, "family day-care provider" is as defined in RCW 43.216.010.

[ 2018 c 58 s 26; 2007 c 17 s 9; 2003 c 286 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.